Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.47.010

Highways, granting land for.

A code city may exercise the powers relating to granting of property for state highway purposes as authorized by RCW 47.12.040 in accordance with the procedures therein prescribed.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.47.010.]